Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB376.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART XXXSTATE-OWNED ELECTRONIC DEVICES AND NETWORKSChapter71. (Reserved)73. Unauthorized ApplicationsCHAPTER 71(Reserved)CHAPTER 73UNAUTHORIZED APPLICATIONSSec.7301. Definitions.123456789101112131415161718 7302. Prohibition.§ 7301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Electronic device." A device that is capable of downloading and accessing an unauthorized application."State-owned." In reference to a device, that State money was used in acquiring the device."Unauthorized application." The social networking service TikTok or any successor application or service developed or provided by ByteDance Limited or an entity owned by ByteDance Limited.§ 7302. Prohibition.(a) On device.--Within three months of the effective date of this section, an individual may not download or install an unauthorized application on a State-owned electronic device.(b) On network.--An individual may not access an unauthorized application on a State wireless network.(c) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to an individual who is engaging in law enforcement activities, security interests, security research or risk mitigation actions.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0376PN0322 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324